incubator/apertium-fr-nl/apertium-fr-nl.nl.dix
    <pardef n="de__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="en__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="als__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="maar"><i>maar</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dus"><i>dus</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="want"><i>want</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
     <e lm="dan"><i>dan</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="als"><i>als</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="als"><i>als</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="behalve dat"><i>behalve dat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dat"><i>dat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hoewel"><i>hoewel</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="inzoverre dat"><i>inzoverre<b/>dat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="nudat"><i>nudat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="of"><i>pf</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="omdat"><i>omdat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="nadat"><i>nadat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sinds"><i>sinds</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tenzij"><i>tenzij</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="terwijl"><i>terwijl</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="toen"><i>toen</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wanneer"><i>wanneer</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="voordat"><i>voordat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zoals"><i>zoals</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zodat"><i>zodat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zolang"><i>zolang</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zonder dat"><i>zonder dat</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zover"><i>zover</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="de__det"/></e>
